District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-921.10

District Department of Transportation Operating Fund.

Repealed.

History

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 9b, formerly § 11a
as added Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 6062, 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, §§ 5(t)(1), 113, 53 DCR 6794
renumbered Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 6014(a), 53 DCR 6899
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-294, § 5, 54 DCR 1086
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 6003(a), 54 DCR 7052
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 251, 56 DCR 1117
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 626(a), 58 DCR 1008

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Highway Trust Fund and District Department of Transportation Temporary Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-66, March 8, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 2516).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6062 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of Highway Trust Fund and District Department of Transportation Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-206, November 17, 2005, 52 DCR 10524).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Highway Trust Fund and District Department of Transportation Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-281, February 27, 2006, 53 DCR 1628).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6014 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Highway Trust Fund and District Department of Transportation Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-498, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8842).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6014 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6014 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Highway Trust Fund and District Department of Transportation Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-7, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1463).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6003(a) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 626(a) of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle E of title VI of Law 16-33: Section 6061 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle E of title VI of the act may be cited as the District Department of Transportation Operating Fund Establishment Amendment Act of 2005.

Editor's Notes

Section 629 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided: “Sec. 629. Applicability. This subtitle shall apply as of October 1, 2011; except, that sections 622 and 623(a)(2) shall apply as of the effective date of this act.”

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 made a technical correction to D.C. Law 17-353 which did not affect the repeal of this section.